Utah statutes.
58-60-402.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Sections 58-1-102 and 58-60-102, as used in
this part:
(1)  "Board" means the Professional Counselor Licensing Board created in
Section 58-60-403.
(2)  "Practice of professional counseling" means the practice of mental health
therapy by means of observation, description, evaluation, interpretation,
intervention, and treatment to effect modification of human behavior by the
application of generally recognized professional counseling principles,
methods, and procedures for the purpose of preventing, treating, or
eliminating mental or emotional illness or dysfunction, symptoms of any of
these, or maladaptive behavior.
